Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,247
Legislative intent to appropriate; grants; restrictions.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate three million seventy-four thousand dollars from federal funds for FY2022-23 to the Department of Economic Development. The federal funds described in this subsection are the funds received by the State of Nebraska from the United States Economic Development Administration's American Rescue Plan Travel, Tourism and Outdoor Recreation program.

(2) Money from the intended appropriation described in subsection (1) of this section shall be for grants awarded to eligible grantees as follows:

(a) No less than one million dollars to eligible grantees located within one or more qualified census tracts within a city of the metropolitan class;

(b) No less than one million dollars to eligible grantees located within one or more qualified census tracts within a city of the primary class; and

(c) No less than one million dollars to eligible grantees in qualified census tracts that are located outside of a city of the metropolitan class or a city of the primary class.

Laws 2022, LB1024, § 15.
April 19, 2022